Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1511
Interference with deputy registrar; penalty.

Any person who (1) knowingly or willfully obstructs, hinders, assaults, or, by bribery, solicitation, or otherwise, interferes with any deputy registrar in carrying out his or her powers or duties, (2) hinders or prevents the attendance of any deputy registrar at any registration of voters or revision of voter registration lists, or (3) unlawfully molests, interferes with, removes, or ejects from any place of registration or revision of registration any deputy registrar or unlawfully threatens, attempts, or offers to do so shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 410.